src/phonology/crk-phon.xfscript
define w2oNDRule [ w3 %< -> 0 || .#. _ [ o | ô ] ,, w3 %< -> o || .#. _ Consonant ] .o. [ w3 -> w ] ;

! "i20NDRule"
! i:0 <=> .#. w3:o _ %<:0 ;

!!€ w3<spiton
!!€ o0spiton

!!€ ni<spiton
!!€ ni0spiton

!!€ ki<spiton
!!€ ki0spiton

!!€ w3<îpit
!!€ w0îpit

!!€ w3<ahkwan
!!€ w0ahkwan

! n3:n

! n3<o -> nô
! n<i<tanis
! ni<tanis

! [nk]i<V[^o] -> [nk]0<V
! [nk]i<o -> [nk]0<ô

define i2VPossNDRule  [ [ i4 %< o ] -> %< ô || .#. [ n | k | m ] _ ,, i4 -> i || .#. [ n | k | m ] _ %< Consonant ] .o. [ i4 -> 0 ] ;

!!€ ni4<ohkom
!!€ n00ôhkom

!!€ ni4<ohkom>i2nân>ak
!!€ n00ôhkom0inân0ak

!!€ ki4<ohkom
!!€ k00ôhkom

!!€ w3<ohkom>a
!!€ 00ohkom0a

define o2ooPossNounRule [ o -> ô || .#. [ [ n i ] | [ k i ] | o ] [ t | t2 ] %< _ ] ;

!!€ nit2<ospwâkan
!!€ nit0ôspwâkan

!!€ kit2<ospwâkan
!!€ kit0ôspwâkan

!!€ ot2<ospwâkan
!!€ ot0ôspwâkan

!! Composing the rules together

define deep2surfRule [ i2 -> i ,, ii2 -> î ,, n2 -> n ,, n3 -> n ,, t3 -> t ,, w2 -> w ,, y4 -> y ] ;

define rmTriggerRule [ [ "^DIM" | "^COM" | "^IC" ] -> 0 ] ;

read regex [
VGi2VVRule
.o. iiRule
.o. Cwi2CoôRule
.o. wFinalRule
.o. etanRule
.o. ee2aaVAIRule
.o. a2eeVTIRule
.o. n2hRule
.o. n20VIIRule
.o. t2cVTIRule
.o. t2sVTA4Rule
.o. t3kostewRule
.o. ReduplRule
.o. t2epenthesisRule
.o. h2epenthesisRule
.o. ICRule
.o. w2oNDRule
.o. i2VPossNDRule
.o. o2ooPossNounRule
.o. DimRule
.o. deep2surfRule
.o. rmTriggerRule
] ;

!!!!! END !!!!!
